en: Disposable Tableware
xx: Disposable Tableware
cs: Ubrusy na jedno použití
da: Engangsservice
de: Einweggeschirr
es: Vajilla desechable
fr: Vaisselle jetable
it: Piatti e posate usa e getta
ja: 使い捨て食器・カトラリー
nl: Wegwerpservies
no: Engangsbestikk og -tallerkener
pl: Zastawa jednorazowa
pt: Utensílios descartáveis
ru: Одноразовая посуда
sv: Engångsartiklar
tr: Tek Kullanımlık Sofra Takımları

en: Disposable Bowls
xx: Disposable Bowls
cs: Jednorázové misky
da: Engangsskåle
de: Einwegschüsseln
es: Cuencos desechables
fr: Bols jetables
it: Recipienti usa e getta
ja: 使い捨て深皿
nl: Wegwerpschalen
no: Engangsboller
pl: Miski jednorazowe
pt: Tigelas descartáveis
ru: Одноразовые миски
sv: Engångsskålar
tr: Tek Kullanımlık Kaplar

en: Disposable Cups
xx: Disposable Cups
cs: Jednorázové kelímky
da: Engangskopper
de: Einwegbecher
es: Vasos desechables
fr: Tasses jetables
it: Tazze usa e getta
ja: 使い捨てカップ
nl: Wegwerpbekers
no: Engangskopper
pl: Kubki jednorazowe
pt: Copos descartáveis
ru: Одноразовые стаканы
sv: Engångsmuggar
tr: Tek Kullanımlık Bardaklar

en: Disposable Cutlery
xx: Disposable Cutlery
cs: Jednorázové příbory
da: Engangsbestik
de: Einwegbesteck
es: Cubertería desechable
fr: Couverts jetables
it: Posate usa e getta
ja: 使い捨てカトラリー
nl: Wegwerpbestek
no: Engangsbestikk
pl: Sztućce jednorazowe
pt: Talheres descartáveis
ru: Одноразовые столовые приборы
sv: Engångsbestick
tr: Tek Kullanımlık Çatal Bıçaklar

en: Disposable Plates
xx: Disposable Plates
cs: Jednorázové talíře
da: Engangstallerkener
de: Einwegteller
es: Platos desechables
fr: Assiettes jetables, Assiette jetable
it: Piatti usa e getta
ja: 使い捨て平皿
nl: Wegwerpborden
no: Engangstallerkener
pl: Talerze jednorazowe
pt: Pratos descartáveis
ru: Одноразовые тарелки
sv: Engångstallrikar
tr: Tek Kullanımlık Tabaklar

en: Food Service Baskets
xx: Food Service Baskets
cs: Jídelní košíky
da: Fletkurv til servering
de: Lebensmittelkörbe
es: Cestas para servir comida
fr: Paniers de restauration
it: Cestini di plastica per alimenti
ja: サービングバスケット
nl: Plastic bakjes
no: Matserveringskurver
pl: Koszyki gastronomiczne
pt: Sacos plásticos para comidas
ru: Пластиковые корзины для продуктов
sv: Korgar för livsmedelsservice
tr: Yemek Servis Sepetleri

en: Food Service Carts
xx: Food Service Carts
cs: Jídelní vozíky
da: Serveringsvogn
de: Servierwagen
es: Carritos de comida
fr: Chariots de restauration
it: Carrelli per alimenti
ja: 配膳ワゴン
nl: Cateringkarretjes
no: Matserveringsvogner
pl: Wózki gastronomiczne
pt: Carrinhos para serviço de alimentação
ru: Сервировочные столики
sv: Matvagnar
tr: Yemek Servis Arabaları

en: Food Washers & Dryers
xx: Food Washers & Dryers
cs: Myčky a sušičky potravin
da: Udstyr til skylning og tørring af fødevarer
de: Gemüseschleudern
es: Lavadoras y secadoras de alimentos
fr: Laveuses et sécheuses industrielles alimentaires
it: Lavatrici ed essicatori per alimenti
ja: 食品洗浄機・乾燥機
nl: Was- en droogapparatuur voor voedingsmiddelen
no: Matvaske- og tørkeapparater
pl: Płuczki i suszarki do żywności
pt: Máquinas para lavar e secar alimentos
ru: Машины для мойки и сушки пищевых продуктов
sv: Tvätt- och torkutrustning för mat
tr: Yiyecek Yıkama ve Kurutma Makineleri

en: Hot Dog Rollers
xx: Hot Dog Rollers
cs: Opékače párků s rolnami
da: Pølseruller
de: Hot-Dog-Grills
es: Máquinas de perritos calientes
fr: Grils tourne-saucisses
it: Macchine per hot dog
ja: ホットドッグローラーグリル
nl: Hotdogrollers
no: Pølsevarmere
pl: Wózki z hot-dogami
pt: Hot-dog rollers
ru: Грили для хот-догов
sv: Rullgrillar för varmkorv
tr: Hot Dog Makineleri

en: Ice Bins
xx: Ice Bins
cs: Nádoby na led
da: Isbeholdere
de: Eisbehälter
es: Depósitos de hielo
fr: Bacs à glace
it: Contenitori per il ghiaccio
ja: アイスストッカー
nl: IJsbakken
no: Isbeholdere
pl: Pojemniki na lód
pt: Local para armazenar gelo
ru: Бункеры для льда
sv: Islårar
tr: Buz Kutuları

en: Plate & Dish Warmers
xx: Plate & Dish Warmers
cs: Ohřívače nádobí
da: Tallerkenvarmere
de: Teller- & Speisenwärmer
es: Calentadores de platos
fr: Chauffe-plats
it: Scaldapiatti
ja: ディッシュウォーマー
nl: Warmhoudplaten voor borden en schalen
no: Tallerkenvarmere
pl: Podgrzewacze do naczyń i potraw
pt: Aquecedores de pratos
ru: Плитки для подогрева тарелок и блюд
sv: Tallriksvärmare
tr: Tabak Isıtma Arabaları

en: Sneeze Guards
xx: Sneeze Guards
cs: Kryt na ochranu pokrmů
da: Glasafskærmninger
de: Auslagenschutz
es: Pantalla protectora para barra
fr: Vitres pare-haleine
it: Parafiato
ja: スニーズガード
nl: Buffetkappen
no: Hosteskjerm til serveringsdisker
pl: Klosze do przykrywania potraw
pt: Vidros protetores para bufê
ru: Защитные буфетные экраны
sv: Nysskydd
tr: Gıda Hijyeni Maskeleri

en: Take-Out Containers
xx: Take-Out Containers
cs: Nádoby na přenášení jídla
da: Takeawaybeholdere
de: Einwegbehälter
es: Recipientes de comida para llevar
fr: Emballages pour vente à emporter
it: Contenitori cibo da asporto
ja: テイクアウト容器
nl: Bakjes voor afhaalmaaltijden
no: Takeaway-beholdere
pl: Pojemniki na wynos
pt: Embalagem para viagem
ru: Контейнеры для еды и напитков на вынос
sv: Behållare för hämtmat
tr: Paket Servis Kapları

en: Tilt Skillets
xx: Tilt Skillets
cs: Naklápěcí pánve
da: Stegepande med vippefunktion
de: Kippbare Industriepfannen
es: Planchas inclinables
fr: Poêles basculantes
it: Brasiere
ja: ティルティングパン
nl: Kantelbraadpannen
no: Elektriske stekepanner for storkjøkken
pl: Patelnie przechylne
pt: Fritadeira industrial
ru: Наклонные сковороды
sv: Industriella stekpannor
tr: Eğimli Tavalar

en: Vending Machines
xx: Vending Machines
cs: Prodejní automaty
da: Salgsautomater
de: Verkaufsautomaten
es: Máquinas expendedoras
fr: Distributeurs automatiques
it: Distributori automatici
ja: 自動販売機
nl: Automaten
no: Salgsautomater
pl: Automaty sprzedające
pt: Máquinas automáticas de venda
ru: Торговые автоматы
sv: Varuautomater
tr: Satış Otomatları

en: Forestry & Logging
xx: Forestry & Logging
cs: Lesnictví a těžba dřeva
da: Skovdrift og skovarbejde
de: Forst- & Holzwirtschaft
es: Ingeniería forestal e industria maderera
fr: Foresterie et exploitation des forêts
it: Selvicoltura e tagli alberi
ja: 林業・伐採
nl: Bosbouw en houthakken
no: Skogbruk og tømmerdrift
pl: Leśnictwo i pozyskiwanie drewna
pt: Silvicultura e corte de madeira
ru: Лесное хозяйство и заготовка леса
sv: Skogsbruk och skogsavverkning
tr: Ormancılık ve Kerestecilik

en: Hairdressing & Cosmetology
xx: Hairdressing & Cosmetology
cs: Kadeřnictví a kosmetika
da: Frisør og kosmetologi
de: Friseur- & Kosmetikgewerbe
es: Peluquería y cosmética
fr: Coiffure et cosmétologie
it: Parruccheria e cosmetologia
ja: 理容・美容
nl: Haar- en schoonheidsverzorging
no: Frisering og kosmetologi
pl: Fryzjerstwo i kosmetologia
pt: Cabeleireiros e Cosmetologia
ru: Парикмахерское дело и косметология
sv: Hårfrisering och kosmetologi
tr: Saç Kesimi ve Kozmetoloji

en: Hairdressing Capes & Neck Covers
xx: Hairdressing Capes & Neck Covers
cs: Kadeřnické čepice a pláštěnky
da: Friserslag
de: Friseurumhänge & Halskrausen
es: Capas y fundas cubrecuello para peluquería
fr: Capes de coupe et protège-cou pour coiffure
it: Mantelle e copricollo da parrucchiera
ja: カットクロス・ネックカバー
nl: Kapmantels en -kragen
no: Frisørkapper og nakkepapir
pl: Peleryny fryzjerskie i osłony na szyję
pt: Capas para cabeleleiros e proteções de pescoço
ru: Парикмахерские накидки и воротнички
sv: Frisörkappa och nackskydd
tr: Kuaför Önlükleri ve Boyun Örtüleri

en: Pedicure Chairs
xx: Pedicure Chairs
cs: Pedikérská křesla
da: Pedicurestole
de: Pedikürestuhl
es: Sillas de pedicura
fr: Fauteuils de pédicure
it: Sedie per pedicure
ja: ペディキュア用チェア
nl: Pedicurestoelen
no: Fotpleiestoler
pl: Fotele do pedicure
pt: Cadeiras para pedicure
ru: Кресла для педикюра
sv: Pedikyrstolar
tr: Pedikür Koltukları

en: Salon Chairs
xx: Salon Chairs
cs: Kadeřnická křesla
da: Salonstole
de: Salonstühle
es: Sillas de peluquería
fr: Fauteuils de coiffure
it: Poltrone per salone di bellezza
ja: サロン用チェア
nl: Salonstoelen
no: Frisørstoler
pl: Fotele do salonów kosmetycznych
pt: Cadeiras para salão de cabeleireiro
ru: Кресла для парикмахерских
sv: Friserstolar
tr: Berber Koltukları